Hawaii statutes.
§709-903 Persistent nonsupport. (1) A
person commits the offense of persistent nonsupport if the person knowingly and
persistently fails to provide support which the person can provide and which
the person knows the person is legally obliged to provide to a spouse, child,
or other dependent.

(2) "Support" includes but is not
limited to food, shelter, clothing, education, and other necessary care as
determined by law.

(3) Persistent nonsupport is a misdemeanor. [L
1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen ch 1993]

COMMENTARY ON §709-903

The purpose of laws dealing with nonsupport by a person who
owes a duty of support to another is to enforce compliance with the legislative
directive setting forth a community standard; yet a policy of strict criminal
punishment of offenders would frustrate the purpose of the law by
incapacitating (by incarceration or fine) the defendant from providing the
support.

Exemplary punishment is of doubtful
efficacy in complex family situations, where many forces, psychic, social, and
economic, may combine to excuse, if not justify, the behavior. Moreover,
imprisonment should be a last resort here, since it incapacitates the defendant
from providing the very support which the community seeks to require and
frustrates any broader effort to rehabilitate the family situation. Recent
thought has favored the development of "family courts" staffed to
handle non-support and other intra-family problems primarily through social
work, with less concentration on purely fiscal aspects.[1]

The Code adopts the position that intervention of the criminal
process ought to take place only as a last resort. The primary resort ought to
be to the social and counseling processes of the Family Court. It is only when
a record has been established of repeated, persistent failure to provide the
support which the defendant can provide and which the defendant knows the
defendant is obliged by law to provide that the criminal process ought to be
employed.

By focussing on "persistent"
defaulters, we express a legislative policy in favor of resort, in the first
instance, to non-penal measures....

The concept of "persistent"
violation is not unprecedented in penal law.... The term connotes repetition,
obstinacy, wilfulness; and it is difficult to formulate a more precise standard
to differentiate the aggravated case of continued defiance of the support law,
which we wish to penalize, from the simple case of default which may be solved
by an official notice or judicial order to pay, or some intelligent social
work.[2]

There were a number of provisions in previous law which dealt
with the problem of nonsupport, and they were not totally consistent with one
another. None of them focused on the concept of persistent default as a
condition precedent for a criminal sanction; however, in actual practice, the
prosecutor probably required some degree of persistency.

Under Hawaii's adoption, in modified form of the Uniform
Desertion and Nonsupport Act:

Any husband who
deserts or wilfully neglects his wife, or wilfully fails, neglects, or refuses
to provide for her support or maintenance, thereby reducing her to destitute or
necessitous circumstances, or any parent who deserts or wilfully neglects his
or her child or children under the age of sixteen years, or wilfully fails, neglects
or refuses to provide for the support or maintenance of the child or children
or wilfully fails, neglects, or refuses to pay amounts awarded for the support
and maintenance of such child or children under a decree of divorce, thereby
reducing the child or children to destitute or necessitous circumstances, shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor, and on conviction thereof, shall be punished by a
fine not exceeding $500 or imprisonment not exceeding one year, or both;
provided, that instead of imposing the sentence provided in this section the
court may release the defendant under suspended sentence for such period as
shall be fixed by the court and under such terms as shall be fixed by the court
as to the payment weekly or otherwise of money for the support of the wife or
child and as to giving security for such payments and for the appearance of the
defendant at such time or times as the court shall direct. The terms so fixed
by the court shall be subject to change or additional security at any time.[3]

Under the chapter dealing with protection of children,
substantially similar conduct, as it related to children, subjected the
offender to a sentence with approximately half the severity of that provided
under the Uniform Act.

Any person who wilfully abandons ... any
child under his legal control or neglects to provide the child with suitable or
necessary food or clothing ... shall be fined not more than $200 or imprisoned
not more than six months.[4]

The statutes imposing a duty of support are not exactly consistent
in defining the extent of the duty. Although an illegitimate child does not
have a right to be supported by its father,[5] if an action to establish
paternity is brought and paternity is established, the child becomes entitled,
with certain exceptions, to "support, maintenance and education"
until the child reaches eighteen years of age.[6] Under certain specific
circumstances, a step-parent is required to support his or her step-child.[7]
The age to which the duty to support one's children continues is not specified,
except in the case of illegitimates, although by inference it continues until
the child has achieved majority.[8]

The Code attempts to reconcile some of the latent ambiguities
which exist in comparing the various sections of prior law. A single section
covering penal default of support provides a uniform authorized sentence for
similar conduct. By covering "spouse, child or other dependent," the
Code provides that the penal sanction may be employed in all cases where the
support law establishes a duty of support. The use of the word "child"
in this section is intended to cover all persons who have not reached the age
of majority. The definition of support ensures that all forms of care which
are required by the support law are covered. However, unlike the previous law,
which, on its face, would allow resort to prosecution in the first instance of
default, the Code requires that the default be persistent before a prosecution
can be successfully maintained.

SUPPLEMENTAL COMMENTARY ON §709-903

The Proposed Draft had included "medical attention"
as one of the items of "support." However, that was deleted by the legislature
in 1972. As stated in Conference Committee Report No. 2 (1972):

Your Committee has agreed to the
deletion of the words "medical attention" as a requisite of the term "support"
in order to avoid penalizing the free exercise of certain religions.

Case Notes

Reasonable to conclude that term "support" includes
medical attention and medical assistance, except where the exercise of religion
is involved. 8 H. App. 506, 810 P.2d 672 (1991).

__________

§709-903 Commentary:

1. M.P.C., Tentative Draft No. 9, comments at 188 (1959).

2. Id. at 188-189.

3. H.R.S. §575-1.

4. Id. §577-12.

5. See id. §577-14 (semble).

6. Id. §579-4.

7. Id. §577-4.

8. But see id. §571-2, which defines, for purposes of chapter 571,
"child" to mean "a person less than eighteen years of age."

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next